California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) If the commissioner finds, as a result of any examination or investigation or from any report made to the commissioner, that any person subject to this part, other than an investment adviser subject to Section 25230.1, is in an insolvent condition, or is conducting a securities, broker-dealer, or investment advisory business in such an unsafe, injurious, or unauthorized manner as to render further operations hazardous to the public or to customers, the commissioner may, by an order addressed to and served by registered or certified mail or by personal service on that person and on any other person having in his or her possession or control any client funds, trust funds, or other property deposited with that person, direct discontinuance of the disbursement of client or trust funds by
 the parties or any of them, the receipt of client or trust funds, or other business operations. No person having in his or her possession any of these funds shall be liable for failure to comply with the order unless he or she has received written notice of the order. Subject to subdivision (b), the order shall remain in effect until set aside by the commissioner, in whole or in part, the person is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy, or pursuant to Section 25253, the commissioner has assumed possession of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after that receipt unless the person subject to this
 division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of the notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing. Neither the request for a hearing nor the hearing itself shall stay the order issued by the commissioner under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 30.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

25249.

If, after examination or investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any broker-dealer or investment adviser is violating or has violated any law or rule binding upon it, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the broker-dealer or investment adviser, direct the discontinuance of the violation. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section 25251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25250.

If, after examination or investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any broker-dealer or investment adviser, other than an investment adviser subject to Section 25230.1, is conducting or has conducted business in an unsafe or injurious manner, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the broker-dealer or investment adviser, direct the discontinuance of the unsafe or injurious practices. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section 25251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25251.

(a) No order issued pursuant to Section 25249 or 25250 may become final except after notice to the affected broker-dealer or investment adviser of the commissioner’s intention to make the order final and of the reasons for the finding. The commissioner shall also notify the broker-dealer or investment adviser that upon receiving a request the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 15 business days after receipt of the request. The broker-dealer or investment adviser may consent to have the hearing commence at a later date. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after the mailing or service of the required notice, and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order may become final without a hearing and the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall immediately discontinue the
 practices named in the order. If a hearing is requested or ordered, it shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that act. If, upon the conclusion of the hearing, it appears to the commissioner that the broker-dealer or investment adviser is conducting or has conducted business in an unsafe and injurious manner or is violating or has violated any law of this state, or any rule binding upon it, the commissioner shall make the order of discontinuance final and the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order.

(b) The broker-dealer or investment adviser may within 10 days after an order is made final commence an action to restrain enforcement of the order. If the enforcement of the order
 is not enjoined within 10 days by the court in which the action is brought, the broker-dealer or investment adviser shall comply with the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 3.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25252.

The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by orders, levy administrative penalties as follows:

(a) Any person subject to this division, other than a broker-dealer or investment adviser, who willfully violates any provision of this division, or who willfully violates any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this division, is liable for administrative penalties of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation, and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each subsequent violation.

(b) Any broker-dealer or investment adviser that willfully violates any provision
 of this division to which it is subject, or that willfully violates any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this division and to which it is subject, is liable for administrative penalties of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation, not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the second violation, and not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each subsequent violation.

(c) The administrative penalties shall be collected by the commissioner and paid into the State Corporations Fund.

(d) The administrative penalties available to the commissioner pursuant to this section are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination with civil, criminal, and other administrative remedies deemed advisable by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of this division.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative penalty and costs awarded in a final decision and order compelling the respondent, or the named or cited person, to comply with the final decision of the commissioner brought under this division. The application shall include a certified copy of the final decision of the commissioner and shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order from superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 335, Sec. 4.   (SB 538)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25253.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any of the conditions specified in subdivision (b) has occurred with respect to any broker-dealer or investment adviser subject to this division, the commissioner shall dispatch a written notice demanding remedial action and a summary of findings, as referred to in Section 25248, to the principal officer of that broker-dealer or investment adviser or to its manager of record.

(b) The conditions that require the commissioner to commence remedial action against a broker-dealer or investment adviser pursuant to subdivision (a) includes any of the following:

(1) The broker-dealer or investment adviser is in an insolvent condition.

(2) It is conducting its securities, broker-dealer, or investment advisory business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner.

(3) It has violated any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this division that is or has been necessary for the protection of any investor.

(4) It refuses to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of any examiner or investigator.

(5) It neglects or refuses to observe any order of the commissioner made pursuant to this division that is or has been necessary for the protection of any investor, within the time specified therein, unless the enforcement of the order is restrained in a proceeding brought by the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(6) It has violated any provision of this division or any similar regulatory scheme of this state or a foreign jurisdiction relating to the protection of any investor.

(7) Any officer, director, stockholder, or partner of the broker-dealer or investment adviser, or attorney-in-fact of the broker-dealer or investment adviser has embezzled, misappropriated, or willfully diverted the assets or client or trust funds of the broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(8) It has permitted its capital to be lower than the minimum required by law, including any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this division.

(9) It has failed to comply with the bonding requirements of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25210) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25230) of this part.

(c) The broker-dealer or investment adviser shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to comply or otherwise effect those remedies specified in the written notice or any other remedies that the commissioner may deem acceptable. However, if the broker-dealer or investment adviser fails to comply within five days of receipt of the notice, or as soon as it appears to the commissioner that no compliance is possible, or in the event prompt delivery of the written notice is impossible, the commissioner may take possession of the property and business of the broker-dealer or investment adviser and retain possession until the broker-dealer or investment adviser, subject to those conditions that the commissioner may prescribe, resumes its business or its affairs are finally liquidated.

(d) Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of any broker-dealer or investment adviser, the broker-dealer or investment adviser, within 10 days after the taking, may apply to the superior court to enjoin further proceedings in any California county or city and county in which the California office or offices of the broker-dealer or investment adviser is located. The court, after ordering the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and after a hearing and a determination of the facts upon the merits, may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender the property and business to the broker-dealer or investment adviser, or make any further order that may be just.

(e) If any facts occur that would entitle the commissioner under subdivision (b) to take possession of the property, business, and assets of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, the commissioner may appoint a conservator of the broker-dealer or investment adviser and require the conservator to post a bond. The conservator, under the direction of the commissioner, shall take possession of the property, business, and assets of the broker-dealer or investment adviser and take any action that the conservator deems necessary to conserve the assets of the broker-dealer or investment adviser pending further disposition of its business. The conservator shall retain possession until the property, business, and assets of the broker-dealer or investment adviser are returned to the broker-dealer or investment adviser or until further order of the commissioner.

(f) Subject to the other provisions of this section, a conservator, while in possession of the property, business, and assets of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, has the same powers and rights and is subject to the same duties and obligations as the commissioner while in possession of the property, business, and assets of a broker-dealer or investment adviser. During that time, the rights of a broker-dealer or investment adviser and of all persons with respect thereto, subject to the other provisions of this section, are the same as if the commissioner had taken possession of the property, business, and assets. A conservator, while in possession of the property, business, and assets of a broker-dealer or investment adviser shall have all the rights, powers, and privileges of the broker-dealer or investment adviser, its officers and directors or partners. All expenses of the conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the broker-dealer or investment adviser and shall be a lien thereon which shall be prior to any other lien.

(g) An investment adviser subject to Section 25230.1 is not subject to this section, unless that investment adviser or persons acting on behalf of that investment adviser committed any of the acts of fraud or deceit set forth in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 391, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25254.

(a) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any administrative action brought under this part a claim for ancillary relief, including, but not limited to, a claim for restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the administrative law judge shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(b) In an administrative action brought under this part, the commissioner is entitled to recover costs, which in the discretion of the administrative law judge may include an amount representing reasonable attorney’s fees and investigative expenses for the services rendered, for deposit into the State Corporations Fund for the
 use of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the ancillary relief and costs awarded in a final decision and order compelling the respondent, or the named or cited person, to comply with the final decision of the commissioner brought under this division. The application shall include a certified copy of the final decision of the commission and shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order from superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 77.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25255.

The civil, criminal, and administrative remedies available to the commissioner pursuant to this division are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination deemed advisable by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 391, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25256.

(a) For any broker-dealer or investment adviser, a disciplinary action taken by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country for an action substantially related to the activity regulated under this division may be grounds for disciplinary action by the commissioner. A certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action taken against the licensee by the State of California, other state, agency of the federal government, or other country shall be conclusive evidence of the events related therein.

(b) Nothing in this section precludes the commissioner from applying a specific statutory provision in this division providing for discipline against a broker-dealer or investment adviser, as a result of disciplinary action taken against a broker-dealer or an investment adviser, by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 473, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 4. ADVERTISING SECURITIES [25300. - 25302.]

25300.

(a) No person shall publish any advertisement in this state concerning any security sold or offered for sale in this state unless a true copy of the advertisement has first been filed in the office of the commissioner at least three business days prior to the publication or a shorter period as the commissioner may by rule or order allow.

(b) Subdivision (a) of this section does not apply to:

(1) Any advertisement for any security published by a licensed broker-dealer if the broker-dealer is not effecting transactions in that security as an underwriter or other participant in a distribution for the issuer;

(2) Any advertisement for any security published by an issuer or any underwriter or other participant in a distribution for the issuer if the security or transaction is exempted by the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of Part 2 of this division;

(3) Any advertisement for any security in a nonissuer transaction if the security is exempted by Section 25100 or an offer of the security is exempted by subdivision (g) of Section 25104;

(4) Any advertisement permitted or required by Section 5(b)(2) or Section 2(a)(10)(b) of the Securities Act of 1933 with respect to a security which has been registered under the Securities Act of 1933 and qualified for sale in this state;

(5) Any advertisement with respect to (A) a security that is subject to
 Sections 25100.1 and 25101.1 and the advertisement is permitted or required under the Securities Act of 1933, (B) a transaction that is subject to Section 25102.1 and the advertisement is permitted or required under the Securities Act of 1933, or (C) an investment adviser that is subject to Section 25230.1 and the advertisement is permitted or required under the Investment Adviser Act of 1940; or

(6) Any other advertisement exempted by rule of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 49.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25301.

All advertisements published by any broker-dealer that are exempted from filing by paragraph (1) or paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 25300 shall be approved prior to use by signature or initial of an officer, partner, or responsible supervisory official of the broker-dealer and the signed or initialed copy shall be retained by the broker-dealer in an appropriate file for a period of three years, subject to examination by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 391, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25302.

(a) A person shall not publish any advertisement concerning any security in this state after the commissioner finds that the advertisement contains any statement that is false or misleading or omits to make any statement necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading and so notifies the person in writing. This notification may be given summarily without notice or hearing. At any time after the issuance of a notification under this section, the person desiring to use the advertisement may in writing request that the order be rescinded. Upon the receipt of the written request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 15 business days after receipt unless the person making the request consents to a later date. After the hearing, which shall
 be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the commissioner shall determine whether to affirm and continue or to rescind the order, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted under the act.

(b) This section does not apply to any advertisement for any security which is subject to the supervision, regulation or examination of any of the following:

(1) The Insurance Commissioner.

(2) The Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(3) The Public Utilities Commission.

(4) The Comptroller of the Currency of the United States.

(5) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(6) The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 78.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 5. FRAUDULENT AND PROHIBITED PRACTICES [25400. - 25404.]

25400.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, in this state:

(a) For the purpose of creating a false or misleading appearance of active trading in any security or a false or misleading appearance with respect to the market for any security, (1) to effect any transaction in a security which involves no change in the beneficial ownership thereof, or (2) to enter an order or orders for the purchase of any security with the knowledge that an order or orders of substantially the same size, at substantially the same time and at substantially the same price, for the sale of any such security, has been or will be entered by or for the same or different parties, or (3) to enter an order or orders for the sale of any security with the knowledge that an order or orders of substantially the same size, at substantially the same time and at substantially the same price, for the purchase of any such security, has been or will be entered by or for the same or different parties.

(b) To effect, alone or with one or more other persons, a series of transactions in any security creating actual or apparent active trading in such security or raising or depressing the price of such security, for the purpose of inducing the purchase or sale of such security by others.

(c) If such person is a broker-dealer or other person selling or offering for sale or purchasing or offering to purchase the security, to induce the purchase or sale of any security by the circulation or dissemination of information to the effect that the price of any such security will or is likely to rise or fall because of market operations of any one or more persons conducted for the purpose of raising or depressing the price of such security.

(d) If such person is a broker-dealer or other person selling or offering for sale or purchasing or offering to purchase the security, to make, for the purpose of inducing the purchase or sale of such security by others, any statement which was, at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact, or which omitted to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, and which he knew or had reasonable ground to believe was so false or misleading.

(e) For a consideration, received directly or indirectly from a broker-dealer or other person selling or offering for sale or purchasing or offering to purchase the security, to induce the purchase or sale of any security by the circulation or dissemination of information to the effect that the price of such security will or is likely to rise or fall because of the market operations of any one or more persons conducted for the purpose of raising or depressing the price of such security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25401.

It is unlawful for any person to offer or sell a security in this state, or to buy or offer to buy a security in this state, by means of any written or oral communication that includes an untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which the statements were made, not misleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 19.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.

It is unlawful for an issuer or any person who is an officer, director or controlling person of an issuer or any other person whose relationship to the issuer gives him access, directly or indirectly, to material information about the issuer not generally available to the public, to purchase or sell any security of the issuer in this state at a time when he knows material information about the issuer gained from such relationship which would significantly affect the market price of that security and which is not generally available to the public, and which he knows is not intended to be so available, unless he has reason to believe that the person selling to or buying from him is also in possession of the information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.

(a) Every person who with knowledge directly or indirectly controls and induces any person to violate any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder shall be deemed to be in violation of that provision, rule, or order to the same extent as the controlled and induced person.

(b) Any person that knowingly provides substantial assistance to another person in violation of any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder shall be deemed to be in violation of that provision, rule, or order to the same extent as the person to whom the assistance was provided.

(c) It shall be unlawful for any person directly or indirectly to do any act or thing which would be unlawful for that person to do under any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder through or by any other person.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the power of the state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime under any other statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 391, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

25404.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 6. ENFORCEMENT [25500. - 25550.]



  CHAPTER 1. Civil Liability [25500. - 25510.]

25500.

Any person who willfully participates in any act or transaction in violation of Section 25400 shall be liable to any other person who purchases or sells any security at a price which was affected by such act or transaction for the damages sustained by the latter as a result of such act or transaction. Such damages shall be the difference between the price at which such other person purchased or sold securities and the market value which such securities would have had at the time of his purchase or sale in the absence of such act or transaction, plus interest at the legal rate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.

Any person who violates Section 25401 shall be liable to the person who purchases a security from, or sells a security to, that person, who may sue either for rescission or for damages (if the plaintiff or the defendant, as the case may be, no longer owns the security), unless the defendant proves that the plaintiff knew the facts concerning the untruth or omission or that the defendant exercised reasonable care and did not know (or if the defendant had exercised reasonable care, would not have known) of the untruth or omission. Upon rescission, a purchaser may recover the consideration paid for the security, plus interest at the legal rate, less the amount of any income received on the security, upon tender of the security. Upon rescission, a seller may recover the security, upon tender of the consideration
 paid for the security plus interest at the legal rate, less the amount of any income received by the defendant on the security. Damages recoverable under this section by a purchaser shall be an amount equal to the difference between (a) the price at which the security was bought plus interest at the legal rate from the date of purchase and (b) the value of the security at the time it was disposed of by the plaintiff plus the amount of any income received on the security by the plaintiff. Damages recoverable under this section by a seller shall be an amount equal to the difference between (1) the value of the security at the time of the filing of the complaint plus the amount of any income received by the defendant on the security and (2) the price at which the security was sold plus interest at the legal rate from the date of sale. Any tender specified in this section may be made at any time before entry of judgment. In addition to the relief described above, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees
 and costs to a prevailing purchaser or seller who succeeds in establishing a right to the relief provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.5.

(a) (1) A person who purchases a security from or sells a security to a broker-dealer that is required to be licensed and has not, at the time of the sale or purchase, applied for and secured from the commissioner a certificate under Part 3 (commencing with Section 25200), that is in effect at the time of the sale or purchase authorizing that broker-dealer to act in that capacity, may bring an action for rescission of the sale or purchase or, if the plaintiff or the defendant no longer owns the security, for damages.

(2) Upon rescission and tender of the security, a purchaser may recover the consideration paid for the security plus interest at the legal rate, less the amount of any income received on the security.

(3) Upon rescission and tender of the consideration paid for the security plus interest at the legal rate, a seller may recover the security plus the amount of any income received by the defendant on the security.

(4) Damages recoverable under this section by a purchaser shall be an amount equal to the difference between the following:

(A) The price at which the security was bought plus interest at the legal rate from the date of purchase.

(B) The value of the security at the time it was disposed of by the plaintiff plus the amount of any income received on the security by the plaintiff.

(5) Damages recoverable under this section by a seller shall be an amount equal to the difference between the following:

(A) The value of the security at the time of the filing of the complaint plus the amount of any income received by the defendant on the security.

(B) The price at which the security was sold plus interest at the legal rate from the date of sale.

(6) A tender of a security or of consideration paid for a security plus interest pursuant to this section may be made at any time before entry of judgment.

(b) The court, in its discretion, may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 575, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.

Any person who violates Section 25402 shall be liable to the person who purchases a security from him or sells a security to him, for damages equal to the difference between the price at which such security was purchased or sold and the market value which such security would have had at the time of the purchase or sale if the information known to the defendant had been publicly disseminated prior to that time and a reasonable time had elapsed for the market to absorb the information, plus interest at the legal rate, unless the defendant proves that the plaintiff knew the information or that the plaintiff would have purchased or sold at the same price even if the information had been revealed to him.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.5.

(a) Any person other than the issuer who violates Section 25402 shall be liable to the issuer of the security purchased or sold in violation of Section 25402 for damages in an amount up to three times the difference between the price at which the security was purchased or sold and the market value which the security would have had at the time of the purchase or sale if the information known to the defendant had been publicly disseminated prior to that time and a reasonable time had elapsed for the market to absorb the information and shall be liable to the issuer of the security or to a person who institutes an action under this section in the right of the issuer of the security for reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.

(b) The amounts recoverable under this section by the issuer shall be reduced by any amount paid by the defendant in a proceeding brought by the Securities and Exchange Commission with respect to the same transaction or transactions under the federal Insider Trading Sanctions Act of 1984 (15 U.S.C. Secs. 78a, 78c, 78o, 78t, 78u, and 78ff) or any other act regardless of whether the amount was paid pursuant to a judgment or settlement or paid before or after the filing of an action by the plaintiff against the defendant. If a proceeding has been commenced by the Securities and Exchange Commission but has not been finally resolved, the court shall delay entering a judgment for the plaintiff under this section until that proceeding is resolved.

(c) If any shareholder of an issuer alleges to the board that there has been a violation of this section, the board shall be required to consider the allegation in good faith, and if the allegation involves misconduct by any director, that director shall not be entitled to vote on any matter involving the allegation. However, that director may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board or a committee of the board.

(d) This section shall only apply to issuers who have total assets in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and have a class of equity security held of record by 500 or more persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1339, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.

Any person who violates Section 25110, 25130, or 25133, or a condition of qualification under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25110) of this part, imposed pursuant to Section 25141, or an order suspending trading issued pursuant to Section 25219, shall be liable to any person acquiring from them the security sold in violation of that section, who may sue to recover the consideration they paid for that security with interest thereon at the legal rate, and reasonable attorney’s fees, less the amount of any income received therefrom, upon the tender of that security, or for damages, if they no longer own the security, or if the consideration given for the security is not capable of being returned. Damages, if the plaintiff no longer owns the security, shall be equal to the difference between (a) the purchase
 price plus interest at the legal rate from the date of purchase, plus reasonable attorney’s fees, and (b) the value of the security at the time it was disposed of by the plaintiff plus the amount of any income received therefrom by the plaintiff.

Damages, if the consideration given for the security is not capable of being returned, shall be equal to the value of that consideration plus interest at the legal rate from the date of purchase, provided the security is tendered, plus reasonable attorney’s fees; and if the plaintiff no longer owns the security, damages in that case shall be equal to the difference between (a) the value of the consideration given for the security plus interest at the legal rate from the date of purchase, plus reasonable attorney’s fees; and (b) the value of the security at the time it was disposed of by the plaintiff plus the amount of any income received therefrom by the plaintiff. Any person who violates Section 25120 or a condition of
 qualification under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25120) of this part imposed pursuant to Section 25141, shall be liable to any person acquiring from them the security sold in violation of that section who may sue to recover the difference between (a) the value of the consideration received by the seller and (b) the value of the security at the time it was received by the buyer, with interest thereon at the legal rate from the date of purchase, plus reasonable attorney’s fees. Any person on whose behalf an offering is made and any underwriter of the offering, whether on a best efforts or a firm commitment basis, shall be jointly and severally liable under this section, but in no event shall any underwriter (unless that underwriter shall have knowingly received from the issuer for acting as an underwriter some benefit, directly or indirectly, in which all other underwriters similarly situated did not share in proportion to their respective interest in the underwriting) be liable in any suit or suits
 authorized under this section for damages in excess of the total price at which the securities underwritten by them and distributed to the public were offered to the public. Any tender specified in this section may be made at any time before entry of judgment. No person shall be liable under this section for violation of Section 25110, 25120 or 25130 if the sale of the security is qualified prior to the payment or receipt of any part of the consideration for the security sold, even though an offer to sell or a contract of sale may have been made or entered into without qualification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 617, Sec. 3.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25504.
